Illinois, session 104th, SB2317.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Section 9.02 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/9.02)  (from Ch. 127, par. 145c)7    Sec. 9.02. Vouchers; signature; delegation; electronic 8submission. 9    (a)(1) Other than construction contracts procured by the 10Department of Transportation as provided in item (1.5), any 11Any new contract or contract renewal in the amount of $250,000 12or more in a fiscal year, or any order against a master 13contract in the amount of $250,000 or more in a fiscal year, or 14any contract amendment or change to an existing contract that 15increases the value of the contract to or by $250,000 or more 16in a fiscal year, shall be signed or approved in writing by the 17chief executive officer of the agency or his or her designee, 18and shall also be signed or approved in writing by the agency's 19chief legal counsel or his or her designee and chief fiscal 20officer or his or her designee. If the agency does not have a 21chief legal counsel or a chief fiscal officer, the chief 22executive officer of the agency shall designate in writing a 23senior executive as the individual responsible for signature   SB2317- 2 -LRB104 10933 HLH 21015 b1or approval.2    (1.5) For construction contracts procured by the 3Department of Transportation on or after the effective date of 4this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the 5signature requirement set forth in item (1) shall apply to 6contracts, contract renewals, and orders against a master 7contract in the amount of $750,000 or more and to any contract 8amendment or change to an existing contract that increases the 9value of the contract to or by $750,000 or more in a fiscal 10year. The Department of Transportation may, by rule, adjust 11the applicable monetary threshold set forth in this item (1.5) 12on a yearly basis to reflect inflationary costs in highway 13construction as measured by the United States Department of 14Transportation in the National Highway Construction Cost Index 15or other similar index. A notice of any change in that 16threshold shall be published in the Illinois Transportation 17Bulletin. 18    (2) No document identified in paragraph (1) may be filed 19with the Comptroller, nor may any authorization for payment 20pursuant to such documents be filed with the Comptroller, if 21the required signatures or approvals are lacking.22    (3) Any person who, with knowledge the signatures or 23approvals required in paragraph (1) are lacking, either files 24or directs another to file documents or payment authorizations 25in violation of paragraph (2) shall be subject to discipline 26up to and including discharge.  SB2317- 3 -LRB104 10933 HLH 21015 b1    (4) Procurements shall not be artificially divided so as 2to avoid the necessity of complying with paragraph (1).3    (5) Each State agency shall develop and implement 4procedures to ensure the necessary signatures or approvals are 5obtained. Each State agency may establish, maintain and follow 6procedures that are more restrictive than those required 7herein.8    (6) This subsection (a) applies to all State agencies as 9defined in Section 1-7 of the Illinois State Auditing Act, 10which includes without limitation the General Assembly and its 11agencies. For purposes of this subsection (a), in the case of 12the General Assembly, the "chief executive officer of the 13agency" means (i) the Senate Operations Commission for Senate 14general operations as provided in Section 4 of the General 15Assembly Operations Act, (ii) the Speaker of the House of 16Representatives for House general operations as provided in 17Section 5 of the General Assembly Operations Act, (iii) the 18Speaker of the House for majority leadership staff and 19operations, (iv) the Minority Leader of the House for minority 20leadership staff and operations, (v) the President of the 21Senate for majority leadership staff and operations, (vi) the 22Minority Leader of the Senate for minority staff and 23operations, and (vii) the Joint Committee on Legislative 24Support Services for the legislative support services agencies 25as provided in the Legislative Commission Reorganization Act 26of 1984. For purposes of this subsection (a), in the case of   SB2317- 4 -LRB104 10933 HLH 21015 b1agencies, the "chief executive officer of the agency" means 2the head of the agency. 3    (b)(1) Every voucher or corresponding balancing report, as 4submitted by the agency or office in which it originates, 5shall bear (i) the signature of the officer responsible for 6approving and certifying vouchers under this Act and (ii) if 7authority to sign the responsible officer's name has been 8properly delegated, also the signature of the person actually 9signing the voucher.10    (2) When an officer delegates authority to approve and 11certify vouchers, he shall send a copy of such authorization 12containing the signature of the person to whom delegation is 13made to each office that checks or approves such vouchers and 14to the State Comptroller. Such delegation may be general or 15limited. If the delegation is limited, the authorization shall 16designate the particular types of vouchers that the person is 17authorized to approve and certify.18    (3) When any delegation of authority hereunder is revoked, 19a copy of the revocation of authority shall be sent to the 20Comptroller and to each office to which a copy of the 21authorization was sent.22    The Comptroller may require State agencies to maintain 23signature documents and records of delegations of voucher 24signature authority and revocations of those delegations, 25instead of transmitting those documents to the Comptroller. 26The Comptroller may inspect such documents and records at any   SB2317- 5 -LRB104 10933 HLH 21015 b1time.2    (c) The Comptroller may authorize the submission of 3vouchers through electronic transmissions, on magnetic tape, 4or otherwise.5(Source: P.A. 101-34, eff. 6-28-19; 101-359, eff. 8-9-19; 6102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.